Hawaii statutes.
§246-60 Same; tax deed; redemption.
The tax collector or the tax collector's assistant shall, on payment of the
purchase price, make, execute, and deliver all proper conveyances necessary in
the premises and the delivery of the conveyances shall vest in the purchaser
the title to the property sold; provided that the deed to the premises shall be
recorded within sixty days after the sale; provided further that the taxpayer
may redeem the property sold by payment to the purchaser at the sale, within
one year from the date thereof, or if the deed shall not have been recorded
within sixty days after the sale, then within one year from the date of
recording of the deed, of the amount paid by the purchaser, together with all
costs and expenses which the purchaser was required to pay, including the fee
for recording the deed, and in addition thereto, interest on such amount at the
rate of twelve per cent a year, but in a case of redemption more than one year
after the date of sale by reason of extension of the redemption period on
account of late recording of the tax deed, interest shall not be added for the
extended redemption period. [L 1932 2d, c 40, pt of §66; RL 1935, pt of §1961;
am L 1939, c 221, pt of §7; RL 1945, pt of §5168; am L 1951, c 133, §6; RL 1955,
§128-43; HRS §246-60; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Purchaser has duty to
disclose the redemption amount to taxpayer. 58 H. 53, 564 P.2d 436.

Cited: 39 H. 378,
381.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next